California statutes. Civil Code
(1) Providing advice, or offering to act or acting as an intermediary, including, but not limited to, offering debt negotiation, debt reduction, or debt relief services between a consumer and one or more of the consumer’s creditors, if the primary purpose of that advice or action is to obtain a settlement for less than the full amount of the debt.

(2) Advising, encouraging, or counseling a consumer to accumulate funds in an account for future payment of a reduced amount of debt to one or more of the consumer’s creditors.

(c) “Settlement account” means a depository account established and used for the purpose of holding funds of a consumer to be distributed to a creditor in the event of a settlement of a consumer’s debt with the creditor.

(d) “Consumer” means a person who is allegedly legally responsible for a debt.

(e) “Person” means a natural person or entity, whether a corporation, partnership, association, trust, limited liability company, cooperative, or other organization.

(f) “Creditor” means the person who originated the debt or is assigned, or has purchased for collection, a
 debt for which a consumer is allegedly legally responsible.

(g) “Debt” means money, whether in principal, interest, fees, or other charges, which is due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person to another person and incurred primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(h) “Payment processor” means a person who provides payment processing services.

(i) “Payment processing services” means accepting, maintaining, holding, or distributing funds, or facilitating the acceptance, maintenance, holding, or distribution of funds, on behalf of a consumer for the purpose of facilitating debt settlement services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.302.

(a) A debt settlement provider shall not engage in false, deceptive, or misleading acts or practices when providing debt settlement services. Without limiting the general application of the foregoing, an act or practice is false, deceptive, or misleading, in connection with providing debt settlement services, if the act or practice consists of any of the following:

(1) Making or permitting another entity to publicly make on behalf of the debt settlement provider, a statement or representation that is false, deceptive, or misleading.

(2) Posting directly, or indirectly causing to be posted, an online review or ranking on an internet website if the debt settlement provider, or
 its agent, provided anything of value in exchange for favorable treatment in that review or ranking.

(3) Omitting any material information.

(b) A debt settlement provider shall provide to the consumer the following disclosures along with an unsigned copy of the written contract proposed to be entered into between the debt settlement provider and the consumer no less than three calendar days prior to the execution of that contract by the consumer. A fully executed copy of the contract shall be delivered to the consumer by the debt settlement provider immediately after the debt settlement provider receives the contract.

(1) The contract shall be preceded by a disclosure that contains all of the following information in conspicuous boldface type that is larger than the typeface provided in the contract typeface:

(A) There is no guarantee that any particular debt or all of the consumer’s enrolled debts will be reduced, eliminated, or otherwise settled.

(B) The deposits made pursuant to the contract will not be distributed to the creditor until a settlement is obtained. This may take months to achieve.

(C) If the consumer stops paying any creditor, any of the following may occur:

(i) The creditors may still try to collect.

(ii) The creditors may sue.

(iii) If a creditor obtains a judgment against the consumer, the creditor may garnish the consumer’s wages or levy the consumer’s bank account or accounts, or both garnish the consumer’s
 wages and levy the consumer’s bank account or accounts.

(iv) The consumer’s credit score or credit rating may be negatively impacted.

(D) Failing to pay debts on time may adversely affect the consumer’s credit rating or credit scores.

(E) Specific results cannot be predicted or guaranteed, and the debt settlement provider cannot require a creditor to negotiate or settle a debt.

(F) A consumer may cancel the debt settlement contract at any time without any penalty.

(G) Debt settlement services may not be suitable for all individuals.

(H) Bankruptcy may provide an alternative to debt settlement.

(I) Canceled debt may be counted as income under federal tax law, and the consumer may have to pay income taxes on the amount of forgiven or reduced debt.

(J) Many sources of income may be protected from debt collection. Common sources of protected income include disability insurance benefits, life insurance benefits, military benefits, pension plans, retirement benefits, public assistance, social security benefits, supplemental security income (SSI), unemployment benefits, veterans benefits, workers compensation, and student aid. See form EJ-155 from the Judicial Council for a complete list.

(K) The number of months estimated to enter into settlement agreements that completely resolve all enrolled debts.

(L) All conditions that the consumer must satisfy
 before the debt settlement provider will make a settlement offer to a creditor.

(M) Whether the debt settlement provider pays or receives referral fees.

(2) Each contract between a consumer and debt settlement provider:

(A) Shall list each debt to be serviced, including, for each debt, the name of the creditor and the total amount of the debt. The total amount of the debt may be based on either a billing statement for the debt or information in the consumer’s consumer report, as that term is defined under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.). The billing statement or consumer report must have been issued within 30 calendar days of the date of the contract.

(B) Shall provide the estimated period of time it will take the
 consumer to accumulate in a settlement account the amount of money estimated to be required to settle all debts.

(C) Shall provide the amount of time necessary to achieve the represented results.

(D) Shall provide, in terms easily understood by the least sophisticated consumer, the method that the debt settlement provider will use to calculate the charges and fees for debt settlement services.

(E) Shall provide the name and mailing address of the debt settlement provider and of the consumer.

(F) Shall provide a telephone number at which the consumer may speak, during normal business hours, with a live representative of the debt settlement provider during normal business hours who is able to access information about the consumer’s account.

(G) Shall be provided to the consumer in English and in the language in which it was negotiated or in which the debt settlement services were offered, if that language is one of the languages set forth in Section 1632.

(H) Shall not require a compulsory agreement with any other party. A debt settlement provider may require that the consumer obtain a dedicated settlement account and provide a list of preferred vendors, however a payment processor who receives compensation from the consumer for payment processing services must supply its own contract to the consumer for engagement.

(I) Shall not be entered into by a consumer who is not already allegedly legally responsible for all the debt that will be enrolled in the debt settlement services. In the event multiple consumers engage in a single contract for debt settlement
 services, if any consumer is not proficient in English and speaks a language set forth in Section 1632, a translated copy of the disclosures and contract shall be provided to the consumer in that language and in a manner that complies with this subdivision.

(3) A debt settlement provider shall not communicate with any of a consumer’s creditors until five calendar days after full execution of a contract for debt settlement services.

(c) A debt settlement provider and a payment processor shall not engage in unfair, abusive, or deceptive acts or practices when providing debt settlement services or payment processing services. Without limiting the general application of the foregoing, in connection with providing debt settlement services and payment processing services, an act or practice is unfair, abusive, or deceptive if the act or practice consists of any of the following:

(1) For a debt settlement provider and payment processor, offering to lend money or extend credit to the consumer, or purchase an enrolled debt.

(2) For a debt settlement provider requesting or receiving payment of any fee or consideration for debt settlement services, unless and until all of the following occur:

(A) The debt settlement provider has renegotiated, settled, reduced, or otherwise altered the terms of at least one debt pursuant to a settlement agreement approved and executed by the consumer.

(B) The consumer has made at least one payment pursuant to that settlement agreement between the consumer and the creditor.

(C) To the extent that debts enrolled in a debt settlement service
 are negotiated, settled, or modified individually, the fee or consideration must either:

(i) Bear the same proportional relationship to the total fee for renegotiating, settling, reducing, or altering the terms of the entire debt balance as the individual debt amount bears to the entire debt amount. The individual debt amount and the entire debt amount are those owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the service.

(ii) Represent a percentage of the amount saved as a result of the renegotiation, settlement, reduction, or alteration. The percentage charged cannot change from one individual debt to another. The amount saved is the difference between the amount owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the service and the amount agreed pursuant to the settlement agreement between the consumer and the creditor to satisfy the debt.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2022, for a payment processor, facilitating the distribution of payment of any fee or consideration for debt settlement services before the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) have been met.

 (4) For a payment processor, failing to distribute a statement of accounting to a consumer at least once a month while the consumer is engaged with the payment processor, as well as on or before the fifth business day after a consumer requests a statement of accounting.

(A) When an accounting is available to the consumer online, the payment processor must make prominent and ongoing the ability for a consumer to opt in to a paper accounting to be mailed to the consumer under the terms of this section.

(B) The statement of accounting must contain the following information to the extent
 applicable:

(i) A list of deposits made into, and withdrawals from, the consumer’s settlement account during the previous month.

(ii) The fees that the debt settlement provider has billed and collected in connection with each of the debts settled during the previous month.

(iii) The fees that the payment processor has billed and collected in connection with payment processing services during the previous month.

(iv) The amount of money that the consumer holds in the consumer’s settlement account.

(C) Within five business days of a consumer’s request, a payment processor shall provide a consolidated statement of accounting containing all of the following:

(i) A list of deposits made into, and withdrawals from, the consumer’s settlement account starting from the outset of the contract.

(ii) A list of fees that the debt settlement provider has billed and collected in connection with each of the debts settled starting from the outset of the contract.

(iii) A list of fees that the payment processor has billed and collected in connection with payment processing services starting from the outset of the contract.

(iv) The amount of money that the consumer holds in the consumer’s settlement account.

(5) For a debt settlement provider, failing to distribute a statement of accounting to a consumer at least once a month while the contract for debt
 settlement services is in effect, as well as on or before the fifth business day after a consumer requests a statement of accounting.

(A) When an accounting is available to the consumer online, the debt settlement provider must make prominent and ongoing the ability for a consumer to opt in to a paper accounting to be mailed to the consumer under the terms of this section.

(B) The statement of accounting must contain the following information to the extent applicable:

(i) The amounts, dates, and creditors associated with each settlement obtained by the debt settlement provider on behalf of the consumer.

(ii) The fees that the debt settlement provider has billed and collected in connection with each of the debts settled.

(iii) With respect to any debt settled by the debt settlement provider on behalf of the consumer, all of the following information:

(I) The total amount of money that the consumer paid or will pay to the creditor to settle the debt.

(II) The amount of the debt at the time the debt settlement provider and the consumer entered into the contract.

(III) The amount of the debt at the time the creditor agreed to settle the debt.

(IV) The amount of compensation that the debt settlement provider received, or may receive, to settle the debt.

(d) (1) A consumer may terminate a contract for debt settlement services at
 any time without a fee or penalty of any sort by notifying the debt settlement provider in writing, electronically, or orally.

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) shall be deemed effective immediately upon being sent if made electronically, including via text message or orally. When the notice is sent via certified mail, notice shall be deemed effective upon receipt. When written notice is sent via noncertified mail, notice shall be deemed effective seven calendar days from the date of mailing.

(3) Upon effective notice of request for cancellation of the contract, the debt settlement provider shall do all of the following:

 (A) Immediately cancel the contract.

(B) Immediately notify the payment processor that the consumer has canceled the debt
 settlement services and transmit to the payment processor the consumer’s instruction to close the settlement account and deliver the balance in the settlement account to the consumer.

 (C) Provide, within three business days, a detailed accounting of any amounts received or expected to be received by the debt settlement provider from the consumer’s settlement account after the debt settlement provider received effective notice of request for cancellation. The detailed accounting shall include an explanation of how the amounts were calculated in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(D) Provide within three business days copies of all documents, notices, or other communications it has received from any creditor on behalf of the consumer.

(4) The items in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of
 paragraph (3) shall be sent by United States mail or by electronic means reasonably calculated to reach the consumer.

(5) Upon receipt of notice of cancellation of the contract from the consumer or debt settlement provider, the payment processor shall stop accumulating service fees, close the settlement account, and deliver to the consumer the balance in the settlement account within seven days. The payment processor shall provide, within 10 business days, a detailed accounting of the amount refunded and any amounts sent to the debt settlement provider after or upon the payment processor receiving notice of the cancellation of the contract.

(e) A debt settlement provider shall immediately forward the following notices to the consumer, either by United States mail or by electronic means reasonably calculated to reach the consumer:

(1) Any notice of a lawsuit on an enrolled debt from any person other than the consumer.

(2) Any settlement agreement that a debt settlement provider has negotiated on the consumer’s behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Application of the Fair Debt Settlement Practices Act  [1788.303. - 1788.304.]

1788.303.

This title applies to persons providing payment processing services, debt settlement services, and persons purporting to engage in debt settlement services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.304.

This title does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any person, or the person’s authorized agent, doing business under license and authority of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under Divisions 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), 2 (commencing with Section 5000), and 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of the Financial Code or under any law of this state or of the United States relating to banks or credit unions.

(b) Any nonprofit business organization that is certified as tax-exempt by the Internal Revenue Service and that does not receive compensation from the consumer for providing debt settlement services.

(c) Attorneys and law firms that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The attorney or law firm does not charge for services regulated by this title.

(2) The fees and disbursements are not charges or costs shared, directly or indirectly, with a debt settlement provider.

(3) Any of the following is true:

(A) The attorney or law firm is retained by a consumer for the purpose of legal representation in consumer debt litigation.

(B) The attorney or law firm provides debt settlement services pursuant to representation by retainer for a debt collection matter that does not involve consumer debt.

(C) The attorney or
 law firm is retained by the consumer primarily for purposes other than the settlement of consumer debt.

(d) A merchant-owned credit or creditors association, or a member-owned, member-controlled, or member-directed association whose principal function is that of servicing the community as a reporting agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Enforcement of the Fair Debt Settlement Practices Act [1788.305. - 1788.307.]

1788.305.

(a) A debt settlement provider and a payment processor shall comply with this title.

(b) A consumer may bring a cause of action against a debt settlement provider and a payment processor for violation of any provision of this title in order to recover or obtain any of the following:

(1) Damages in an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(A) Statutory damages in an amount to be determined by the court of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation of this title.

(B) Any actual damages
 sustained by the consumer as a result of the violation.

(2) Injunctive relief.

(3) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(c) (1) In the case of any successful cause of action under this section, the court shall award costs of the action, together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing debt settlement provider and a prevailing payment processor upon a finding by the court that the consumer’s prosecution of the cause of action was not in good faith.

(d) A debt settlement provider or a prevailing payment processor shall have no civil liability for damages under this section if the
 debt settlement provider or a prevailing payment processor shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, and occurred notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any error.

(e) A cause of action brought under this section shall be brought within four years of the latter of the following dates:

(1) The last payment by or on behalf of the consumer.

(2) The date on which the consumer discovered or reasonably should have discovered the facts giving rise to the consumer’s claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.306.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.307.

The provisions of this title are severable. If any provision of this title or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1405)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6D. ELECTRONIC COMMERCE [1789. - 1789.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1789. - 1789.9.]

1789.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is in the public interest that consumers have comprehensive knowledge of services available through electronic commerce and to that end hereby enacts the Electronic Commerce Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.1.

This title may be cited as “The Electronic Commerce Act of 1984.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.2.

For the purposes of this title, the following terms have the meanings expressed in this section:

(a) “Electronic commercial service” or “service” means an electronic shopping system to conduct the purchase of goods and services via a telecommunications network, but does not mean conventional voice-only telephone service, one-way television or radio broadcasting, an electronic fund transfer system, or a service provided through an electronic terminal located at a place of business where the sale of goods or services sold through that service otherwise
occurs.

(b) “Consumer” means a natural person who purchases goods or services using an electronic commercial service.

(c) “Provider of service” means a person who contracts with consumers to provide an electronic commercial service.

(d) “Goods or services” means tangible items or physical services provided to the consumer, or tickets or vouchers for such tangible items or physical services, but does not mean computerized data delivered to the consumer via a computer terminal or in printed form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective June 17, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.3.

The provider of an electronic commercial service shall provide to consumers with which it contracts to provide the service, at the time it contracts to provide the service and annually, on or before June 30 of each year thereafter, all of the following information:

(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the provider of service.

(b) Any charges to the consumer imposed by the provider for the use of the service.

(c) The procedures a consumer may follow
in order to resolve a complaint regarding the service or to receive further information regarding use of the service, including the telephone number and address of the Complaint Assistance Unit of the Division of Consumer Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.5.

(a) Any provider who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this title is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, by any district attorney or city attorney, or by a city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid
to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.6.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to limit the liability of a provider of service to a consumer for errors or omissions arising from the operation of an electronic commercial service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.7.

(a) This title does not apply where it is inconsistent with, or infringes upon, federal law or regulation.

(b) This title does not apply to the rights and obligations of a cardholder and a card issuer with respect to the use of a credit card arising from the purchase of goods or services conducted through an electronic commercial service. For the purpose of this subdivision, “cardholder,” “card issuer,” and “credit card” have the same meaning as those terms are given in the federal Fair Credit Billing Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and regulations adopted
thereunder, or, if applicable, the Song-Beverly Credit Card Act of 1971 (Title 1.3 (commencing with Section 1747)).

(c) This title does not apply to the rights and obligations of a consumer and a financial institution with respect to any electronic fund transfer arising from purchase of goods or services conducted through an electronic commercial service. For the purposes of this subdivision, “consumer,” “financial institution,” and “electronic fund transfer” have the same meaning as those terms are given in the Electronic Fund Transfer Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.8.

This title applies to transactions entered into on or after July 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.9.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6E. CREDIT SERVICES [1789.10. - 1789.26.]

1789.10.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the “Credit Services Act of 1984.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.11.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The ability to obtain and use credit has become of great importance to consumers, who have a vital interest in establishing and maintaining their creditworthiness and credit standing. As a result, consumers who have experienced credit problems may seek assistance from credit services organizations which offer to obtain credit or improve the credit standing of those consumers.

Certain advertising and business practices of some credit services organizations have worked a financial hardship upon the people of this state, often those who are of limited economic means and inexperienced in credit matters. Credit services organizations have significant impact upon
 the economy and well-being of this state and its people.

(b) The purposes of this title are to provide prospective consumers of services of credit services organizations with the information necessary to make an intelligent decision regarding the purchase of those services and to protect the public from unfair or deceptive advertising and business practices.

(c) This title shall be construed liberally to achieve these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.12.

As used in this title:

(a) “Communication” means the conveyance of any information regarding a debt, credit record, credit history, or credit rating, directly or indirectly, to any person by any means or through any medium. 

(b) “Consumer” means any natural person who is solicited to purchase or who purchases the services of a credit services organization.

(c) “Consumer credit reporting agency” has the same meaning as in Section 1785.3.

(d) “Credit services organization” means a person who, with respect to the extension of credit by others, sells, provides, or performs, or represents that the
 person can or will sell, provide, or perform, any of the following services, in return for the payment of money or other valuable consideration:

(1) Improving a consumer’s credit record, history, or rating.

(2) Obtaining a loan or other extension of credit for a consumer.

(3) Providing advice or assistance to a consumer with regard to either paragraph (1) or (2).

(e) “Credit services organization” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any person holding a license to make loans or extensions of credit pursuant to the laws of this state or the United States who is subject to regulation and supervision with respect to the making of those loans or extensions of credit by an official or
 agency of this state or the United States and whose business is the making of those loans or extensions of credit.

(2) Any bank, as defined in Section 103 of the Financial Code, or any savings institution, as specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code, whose deposits or accounts are eligible for insurance by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(3) Any person licensed as a prorater by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation when the person is acting within the course and scope of that license.

(4) Any person licensed as a real estate broker performing an act for which a real estate license is required under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code) and who is acting within the course and scope of
 that license.

(5) Any attorney licensed to practice law in this state, where the attorney renders services within the course and scope of the practice of law, unless the attorney is an employee of, or otherwise directly affiliated with, a credit services organization. This includes attorneys that regularly engage in litigation in furtherance of assisting consumers with credit issues.

(6) Any broker-dealer registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission or the Commodity Futures Trading Commission where the broker-dealer is acting within the course and scope of the regulation.

(7) Any nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that, according to a final ruling or determination by the Internal Revenue Service, is both of the following:

(A) Exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Not a private foundation as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code.

An advance ruling or determination of tax-exempt or foundation status by the Internal Revenue Service does not meet the requirements of this paragraph.

(f) “Data furnisher” has the same meaning as the term “furnisher” is defined in Section 660.2 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) “Extension of credit” means the right to defer payment of debt or to incur debt and defer its payment, offered or granted primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(h) “Person” includes
 an individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, or any business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 2.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.13.

A credit services organization and its salespersons, agents, representatives, and independent contractors who sell or attempt to sell the services of a credit services organization shall not do any of the following:

(a) Charge or receive any money or other valuable consideration prior to full and complete performance of the services the credit services organization has agreed to perform for or on behalf of the consumer.

(b) Fail to perform the agreed services within 180 days following the date the consumer signs the contract for those services.

(c) Fail to provide a monthly statement to the consumer detailing the
 services performed.

(d) Charge or receive any money or other valuable consideration for referral of the consumer to a retail seller or other credit grantor who will or may extend credit to the consumer, if either of the following apply:

(1) The credit that is or will be extended to the consumer (A) is upon substantially the same terms as those available to the general public or (B) is upon substantially the same terms that would have been extended to the consumer without the assistance of the credit services organization.

(2) The money or consideration is paid by the credit grantor or is derived from the consumer’s payments to the credit grantor for costs, fees, finance charges, or principal.

(e) Make, or counsel or advise a consumer to make, a
 statement that is untrue or misleading and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading, to a consumer credit reporting agency or to a person who has extended credit to a consumer, to a data furnisher, or to any person with whom a consumer is applying for an extension of credit, such as statements concerning a consumer’s identification, home address, creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity.

(f) Remove, or assist or advise the consumer to remove, adverse information from the consumer’s credit record that is accurate or not obsolete.

(g) Create, or assist or advise the consumer to create, a new credit record by using a different name, address, social security number, or employee identification number.

(h) Make or use untrue or misleading
 representations in the offer or sale of the services of a credit services organization, including either of the following:

(1) Guaranteeing or otherwise stating that the credit services organization is able to delete an adverse credit history, unless the representation clearly discloses, in a manner equally as conspicuous as the guarantee, that this can be done only if the credit history is inaccurate or obsolete and is not claimed to be accurate by the creditor who submitted the information.

(2) Guaranteeing or otherwise stating that the credit services organization is able to obtain an extension of credit, regardless of the consumer’s previous credit problems or credit history, unless the representation clearly discloses, in a manner equally as conspicuous as the guarantee, the eligibility requirements for obtaining an extension of credit.

(i) Engage, directly or indirectly, in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deception upon a person in connection with the offer or sale of the services of a credit services organization.

(j) Advertise or cause to be advertised, in any manner, the services of the credit services organization, without being registered with the Department of Justice.

(k) Fail to maintain an agent for service of process in this state.

 (l) Transfer or assign its certificate of registration.

(m) Call or submit any communication to a consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt collector, or debt buyer without the prior written authorization of the consumer. A
 relevant authorization in the agreement or contract between a consumer and a credit services organization is sufficient for the purpose of this subdivision.

(n) Submit a consumer’s dispute to a consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt collector, or debt buyer more than 180 days after the account subject to the dispute has been removed from the consumer’s credit report.

(o) Use the online electronic portal, electronic mail system, or telephone system of a consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt collector, or debt buyer to submit a dispute of a consumer or to request disclosure without the prior written authorization of the consumer. A relevant authorization in the agreement or contract between a consumer and a credit services organization is sufficient for the purpose of this subdivision.

(p) Directly
 or indirectly extend credit to a consumer.

(q) Refer a consumer to a credit grantor that is related to the credit services organization by a common ownership, management, or control, including a common owner, director, or officer.

(r) Refer a consumer to a credit grantor for which the credit services organization provides, or arranges for a third party to provide, services related to the extension of credit such as underwriting, billing, payment processing, or debt collection.

(s) Provide a credit grantor with an assurance that a portion of an extension of credit to a consumer referred by the credit services organization will be repaid, including providing a guaranty, letter of credit, or agreement to acquire a part of the credit grantor’s financial interest in the extension of credit.

(t) Use a scheme, device, or contrivance to evade the prohibitions contained in this section.

(u) Fail to make a written communication sent on behalf of a consumer to any credit reporting agency, data furnisher, or legal counsel for either of the foregoing available to the consumer.

(v) Fail to provide along with its first written communication to a credit reporting agency or data furnisher any sufficient information to investigate an account.

(w) The seeking to obtain, or the obtaining of, a consumer’s credit report and the performance of other services necessary to determine the needs of a consumer for the reinvestigation of any accounts shall not constitute services of a credit services organization for which a contract is required pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 1789.16, if that activity is undertaken with the consumer’s prior written, electronic, or recorded oral consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 965, Sec. 3.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1789.134.

(a) A consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt collector, or debt buyer that knows that a consumer is represented by a credit services organization, and that also has knowledge of, or can readily ascertain the credit services organization’s name and address shall communicate with the credit services organization unless either of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The credit services organization fails to respond within 30 days to a communication from a consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt collector, or debt buyer.

(2) The consumer expressly directs the consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, debt
 collector, or debt buyer not to communicate with the credit services organization.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a consumer credit reporting agency, creditor, or debt collector shall not be required to communicate with a credit services organization concerning an account that is subject to a dispute if any of the following apply:
